Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) The Oregon Health Policy  Board, in consultation with the Oregon Health
and Science University and the Office of Rural Health, shall conduct an assessment  of the
health care workforce needs in this state, including but not limited to the health care
workforce needed to address:
(a) The continuing expansion in commercial and publicly funded health care coverage;
(b) Health disparities among medically underserved populations; and
(c) The need for health care providers in rural communities.
(2) The board  shall report to the Legislative Assembly no later than February 1 in each
odd-numbered year on the health care workforce needs in  this state and proposals for ad-
dressing those needs  with programs funded by the Health Care Provider Incentive Fund es-
tablished under ORS 676.450.
SECTION 2.
 (1) As used in this section, “financial incentive programs” includes but is
not limited to the:
(a) Rural health care provider tax credit available under ORS 315.613;
(b) Rural medical practitioners insurance subsidy program under ORS 676.550;
(c) Scholars for a Healthy Oregon Initiative created by ORS 348.303;
(d) Primary Health Care Loan Forgiveness Program created by ORS 442.574; and
(e) Incentives provided by the health care  provider incentive program created by ORS
676.460.
(2) In order to evaluate the effectiveness of state financial  incentive programs in re-
cruiting health care providers to practice in rural  and medically underserved areas and re-
taining health care providers in  rural and medically underserved areas, the Oregon Health
Policy Board shall collect information  about financial incentive program participants, which
may include:
(a) The month and year of entry into the program;
(b) The locations of service and duration of service in each location;
(c) The main services provided, discipline, specialty and hours of direct patient care;
(d) The percentage of services provided through telemedicine; and
Enrolled House Bill 3261 (HB 3261-B) Page 1
(e) Other demographic information that the board and the Office of  Rural Health deter-
mine to be useful in the evaluation.
(3) To  collect the data described in subsection (2) of this section, the board shall use
unique provider identifiers and link the identifiers to the provider data reported under ORS
442.466.
(4) The board shall compile and analyze the data  collected under this section and report
its findings and analysis to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to
health every two years.
SECTION 3. (1) On the basis of the assessment and the evaluation conducted  under
sections 1 and 2 of  this 2017 Act, the Oregon Health Policy Board shall determine the best
allocation of moneys in the Health Care Provider  Incentive Fund established under ORS
676.450 toward providing:
(a) Incentives through  the health care provider incentive program created by ORS
676.460.
(b) Loans or grants to support communities’ plans for addressing the unmet health care
workforce needs in each community, including but not limited to:
(A) Funding start-up costs for new health care professional training programs that:
(i) Are designed to expand the racial and ethnic diversity of Oregon’s  health care
workforce;
(ii) Are designed to expand the health care workforce in medically underserved areas;
(iii) Provide financial incentives to faculty members in health care professional  training
programs and clinical preceptors;
(iv) Ensure that individuals enrolled in the programs are adequately compensated; and
(v) Include technical assistance; and
(B) Supplementing Medicare funding paid to hospitals for graduate medical education.
(2) With respect to the loans and grants provided under subsection (1)(b)  of this section,
the board shall:
(a) Prescribe the process and procedures for communities to apply  for loans or grants
and for the board to award loans and grants.
(b) Establish criteria to ensure that the moneys support community plans that:
(A) Include a substantial financial investment by the community, as determined by the
board, and may include financial or in-kind support;
(B) Are  designed to improve the access to health care by medical assistance recipients
and Medicare enrollees to the same extent that each plan improves access to  health care by
the general population of the community; and
(C) Are sustainable over the long term.
(c) Conduct outreach to communities to solicit ideas and applications for new training
programs and other incentive programs.
(d) Collaborate with community colleges and public universities in this state.
(3) The board shall enter  into an agreement with the Oregon Health and Science Uni-
versity to administer this section under the board’s direction.
SECTION 4.
For the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, moneys in the Health Care Provider
Incentive Fund established under ORS 676.450 shall be allocated as follows:
(1) $4 million for the rural medical  practitioners insurance subsidy program under ORS
676.550.
(2) $4 million to be transferred to the Primary Care Provider  Loan Repayment Fund es-
tablished under ORS 413.127.
(3) $2.5 million  for the Scholars for a Healthy Oregon Initiative created by ORS 348.303
and $1 million for other scholarships.
(4) $500,000  to the Primary Health Care Loan Forgiveness Program created by ORS
442.574.
Enrolled House Bill 3261 (HB 3261-B) Page 2
(5) Up to $1 million for other financial incentives  offered by the health care provider in-
centive program created by ORS 676.460.
(6) Up to  $1 million for the administrative expenses associated with the allocated moneys
in the fund.
(7) Up to $4 million for purposes described in section 3 (1)(b) of this 2017 Act.
(8) Additional moneys remaining in the Health Care Provider Incentive Fund after the
distributions described in subsections (1) to (7)  of this section and unexpended balances, as
of January 1, 2019,  of the allocations made under subsections (1) to (7) of this section shall
be distributed as directed by the Oregon Health Policy Board.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 676.460 is amended to read:
676.460. (1) There  is created in the Oregon Health Authority a health care provider incentive
program for the purpose  of assisting qualified health care providers who [ have committed] commit
to serving medical assistance [ recipients] and Medicare enrollees in rural or medically  underserved
areas of this state. The authority shall prescribe by rule:
(a) Participant eligibility criteria, including  the types of qualified health care providers who may
participate in the program;
(b) The terms and conditions of  participation in the program, including the duration of the term
of any service agreement , which must be at least 12 months ;
(c) The types of incentives that may be provided[ ;], including but not limited to:
(A) Loan repayment subsidies;
(B) Stipends;
(C) Medical malpractice insurance premium subsidies;
(D) Scholarships for students in health professional training programs at the  Oregon
Health and Science University;
(E) Scholarships for students at institutions of  higher education based in this state who
are enrolled in health professional  training programs leading to a doctor of osteopathic
medicine or  doctor of dentistry or a license as a nurse practitioner, physician assistant or
certified registered nurse anesthetist, if:
(i) The scholarship funds are distributed equitably among schools offering the  training
programs, based on the percentage of Oregon students attending those schools; and
(ii) The maximum scholarship for each student does not exceed the highest resident tui-
tion rate at the publicly funded health professional training programs in this state; and
(F) Paying the moving expenses of providers  not located in rural or medically under-
served areas who commit to relocate to such areas;
(d) If the funds allocated to the program from the Health Care Provider  Incentive Fund estab-
lished under ORS 676.450 are  insufficient to provide assistance to all of the applicants who are eli-
gible to participate in  the program, the priority for the distribution of funds[ , based on guidance from
the Health Care Workforce Committee ]; and
(e) The financial  penalties imposed on an individual who fails to comply with terms and condi-
tions of participation.
(2) Eligibility requirements adopted for the program:
(a) Must allow providers to qualify for multiple health care provider incentives,  to the
extent permitted by federal law.
(b) Must allow providers to qualify for an incentive for multiyear periods.
(c) Must give preference to applicants willing to:
(A) Commit to extended periods of service in rural or medically underserved areas; or
(B) Serve patients  enrolled in Medicare and the state medical assistance program in at
least the same proportion to the provider’s  total number of patients as the Medicare and
medical assistance patient populations represent in relation to  the total number of persons
determined by the Office of Rural Health to be in need of health  care in the area served by
the practice.
Enrolled House Bill 3261 (HB 3261-B) Page 3
(3) The authority may  use funds allocated to the program from the Health Care Provider
Incentive Fund to administer or provide funding to a  locum tenens program for health care
providers practicing in rural areas of this state.
[(2)] (4)  The authority may  enter into contracts with one or more public or private entities to
administer the health care provider incentive  program or parts of the program.
(5) The authority shall decide no later than September 1 of each academic year the dis-
tribution of funds for scholarships that will be provided in the next academic year.
(6) The authority may receive gifts, grants or contributions from any source, whether
public or private, to carry out the provisions of this section. Moneys received under  this
subsection shall be deposited in the  Health Care Provider Incentive Fund established under
ORS 676.450.
SECTION 6.  ORS 442.470 is amended to read:
442.470. As used in ORS 442.470 to 442.507:
(1) “Acute inpatient care facility” means a licensed hospital with an organized  medical staff,
with permanent  facilities that include inpatient beds, and with comprehensive medical services, in-
cluding physician services and continuous  nursing services under the supervision of registered
nurses, to provide diagnosis and  medical or surgical treatment primarily for but not limited to
acutely ill patients and accident victims.
(2) “Council” means the Rural Health Coordinating Council.
(3) “Office” means the Office of Rural Health.
(4) “Primary  care physician” means a doctor licensed under ORS chapter 677 whose specialty
is family practice, general practice, internal medicine, pediatrics or obstetrics and gynecology.
(5) “Rural critical access hospital” means a facility that meets the  criteria set forth in
42 U.S.C. 1395i-4 (c)(2)(B) and that  has been designated a critical access hospital by the Office
of Rural Health.
[(5)(a)] (6)(a) “Rural hospital” means a hospital characterized as one of the following:
(A) A type A hospital,  which is a small and remote hospital that has 50 or fewer beds and is
more than 30 miles from another acute inpatient care facility;
(B) A type B hospital, which is a small and rural hospital that has 50 or fewer beds and is 30
miles or less from another acute inpatient care facility;
(C) A type C hospital, which is considered to be a rural hospital and has more than  50 beds, but
is not a referral center; or
(D) A rural critical access hospital [ as defined in ORS 315.613 ].
(b) “Rural hospital” does not include a hospital of any class that was designated by the federal
government as a rural referral hospital before January 1, 1989.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 348.303 is amended to read:
348.303. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Designated service site” means a rural health  clinic as defined in 42 U.S.C. 1395x(aa)(2), a
rural critical access hospital as defined in ORS [ 315.613] 442.470, a federally qualified health center
as defined  in 42 U.S.C. 1396d(l)(2) or any geographic area, population group or facility that is located
in Oregon and has been designated by the Health Resources and  Services Administration of the
United States Department of  Health and Human Services as a health professional shortage area, a
medically underserved area or a medically underserved population.
(b) “Health care practitioner” means a:
(A) Physician licensed under ORS chapter 677;
(B) Dentist licensed under ORS chapter 679;
(C) Nurse practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390;
(D) Physician assistant licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525; or
(E) Certified registered nurse anesthetist licensed under ORS chapter 678.
(c) “Participant” means a person who has been selected by  the Oregon Health and Science
University to receive a scholarship under subsection (5) of this section.
Enrolled House Bill 3261 (HB 3261-B) Page 4
(d) “Prospective health care practitioner” means a person who  has been accepted into, but has
not yet started, a health care program at the Oregon Health and  Science University that meets the
educational  requirements  for licensure as a physician, dentist, nurse practitioner, physician assistant
or certified registered nurse anesthetist.
(e) “Service agreement”  means the agreement executed by a prospective health care practitioner
under subsection (3) of this section.
(2) There is created the Scholars for a  Healthy Oregon Initiative, to be administered by the
Oregon Health and Science University pursuant to rules adopted by the university.
(3) A prospective health care  practitioner who wishes to participate in the initiative shall sub-
mit an application to the Oregon  Health and Science University in accordance with rules adopted
by the university. To be eligible to be a participant in  the initiative, a prospective health care
practitioner must:
(a) Have been accepted into, but not yet started, the first year of  the prospective health care
practitioner’s health care education at the Oregon Health and Science University;
(b) Be considered a resident of Oregon under the  university’s admission guidelines or qualify as
a student exempted from paying nonresident tuition under ORS 352.287;
(c) Execute a service agreement stating that:
(A) Immediately upon the prospective health care practitioner’s completion of the  health care
education degree, residency or training, as established for each degree by the Oregon Health  and
Science University by rule, the  participant will practice as a health care practitioner in a desig-
nated service  site in this state approved by the university for one year longer than the number of
years the participant spent in the health care program for which the  participant received a schol-
arship; and
(B) While practicing as a health care practitioner  in a designated service site, the participant
must see all patients, regardless of any patient’s ability to pay for services; and
(d) Meet other requirements established by the university by rule.
(4) The Oregon Health and  Science University may select participants from among the pro-
spective  health  care practitioners who submit applications as provided in subsection (3) of this sec-
tion. The university shall give preference to prospective health care practitioners who are:
(a) Individuals admitted  to the Oregon Health and Science University as a student from rural
heritage, as defined by the university’s admission policy;
(b) First generation college students; or
(c) Individuals from a diverse or underrepresented community.
(5) The Oregon Health and Science University shall provide a scholarship covering  the entire
cost of tuition and fees for the participant’s health care education at the university.
(6) A participant receiving a scholarship under subsection (5) of this section who  fails to com-
plete the terms of  the service agreement shall repay the amount received plus an additional penalty
of 25 percent of the amount received to the Oregon Health and Science University. The total amount
to be paid  to the university under this subsection shall be reduced for every full year that the par-
ticipant complied with the service agreement on a pro rata basis, as computed by the  total number
of years agreed to in the service agreement.
(7) A participant receiving  a scholarship under subsection (5) of this section who fails to com-
plete the health care degree for which the  scholarship was awarded shall repay the amount received
to the Oregon Health and Science University.
(8) In the event that a participant is required  to repay the Oregon Health and Science Univer-
sity under subsection (6) or (7) of this section, the university may:
(a) Collect any amounts due;
(b) Have any amounts due be collected by the  Collections Unit in the Department of Revenue
under ORS 293.250; or
(c) Contract with a collections agency to collect any amounts due.
(9) Any  moneys received or collected by the Oregon Health and Science University under sub-
sections (6) to (8) of this section shall be deposited into a separate fund held by the university  for
Enrolled House Bill 3261 (HB 3261-B) Page 5
the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this section. The university  may not use the moneys
in these funds for any other purpose.
(10) The Oregon Health and Science University may accept funds from any public or  private
source for the purposes of carrying out the provisions of this section.
(11) Not later than December 1 of each even-numbered year, the Oregon Health and  Science
University shall report  to the Legislative Assembly on the status of the Scholars for a Healthy
Oregon Initiative. The report shall include, for the previous biennium:
(a) The total number of active participants in the initiative; and
(b) A breakdown of active participants in the initiative by health care practitioner category.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 414.743 is amended to read:
414.743. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2)  of this section, a coordinated care organization
that does not have a contract with a hospital to provide inpatient or outpatient  hospital services
under ORS 414.631, 414.651 and  414.688 to 414.745 must, using Medicare payment methodology, re-
imburse the noncontracting hospital  for services provided to a member of the organization at a rate
no less  than a percentage of the Medicare reimbursement rate for those services. The percentage
of the Medicare reimbursement rate that is used to  determine the reimbursement rate under this
subsection is equal to four percentage points less  than the percentage of Medicare cost used by the
Oregon Health Authority in calculating the  base hospital capitation payment to the organization,
excluding any supplemental payments.
(2)(a) If a coordinated care organization does not  have a contract with a hospital, and the hos-
pital provides less than 10 percent of the hospital admissions and outpatient hospital services  to
members of  the organization, the percentage of the Medicare reimbursement rate that is used to
determine the reimbursement rate under subsection (1) of  this section is equal to two percentage
points less than the percentage of Medicare cost used by the Oregon Health Authority in calculating
the base hospital capitation payment to the organization, excluding any supplemental payments.
(b) This subsection is  not intended to discourage a coordinated care organization and a hospital
from entering into a contract  and is intended to apply to hospitals that provide primarily, but not
exclusively, specialty and emergency care to members of the organization.
(3) A hospital that does not have  a contract with a coordinated care organization to provide
inpatient or outpatient hospital services under ORS 414.631, 414.651  and 414.688 to 414.745 must
accept as payment in full for hospital services the rates described  in subsections (1) and (2) of this
section.
(4) This section does not apply to type A and type B hospitals, as described in ORS 442.470, and
rural critical access hospitals, as defined in ORS [ 315.613] 442.470.
(5) The Oregon Health Authority shall adopt rules to implement and administer this section.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 442.315 is amended to read:
442.315. (1) Any new hospital or new  skilled nursing or intermediate care service or facility not
excluded pursuant to ORS 441.065, and any long term care facility for which  a license was surren-
dered under section 15,  chapter 608, Oregon Laws 2013, shall obtain a certificate of need from the
Oregon Health Authority prior to an offering or development.
(2) The authority shall  adopt rules specifying criteria and procedures for making decisions as
to the need for the new services or facilities.
(3)(a) An applicant for a certificate of need shall apply  to the authority on forms provided for
this purpose by authority rule.
(b) An applicant shall pay a fee prescribed as provided in this  section. Subject to the approval
of the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, the authority shall prescribe application fees,
based on the complexity and scope of the proposed project.
(4) The authority shall be the decision-making authority for the  purpose of certificates of need.
The authority may establish an expedited review  process for an application for a certificate of need
to rebuild a long term care facility, relocate buildings that are part  of a long term care facility or
relocate long term care  facility bed capacity from one long term care facility to another. The au-
Enrolled House Bill 3261 (HB 3261-B) Page 6
thority shall issue a proposed order not later than 120 days after the  date a complete application
for expedited review is received by the authority.
(5)(a) An applicant or any affected person who is  dissatisfied with the proposed decision of the
authority is entitled to an informal hearing in the course of review and before a final decision is
rendered.
(b) Following a final decision being rendered  by the authority, an applicant or any affected
person may request a reconsideration hearing pursuant to ORS chapter 183.
(c) In any proceeding brought by an affected person or an  applicant challenging an authority
decision under this subsection, the authority shall  follow procedures consistent with the provisions
of ORS chapter 183 relating to a contested case.
(6) Once a certificate of need has been issued,  it may not be revoked or rescinded unless it was
acquired by fraud or deceit. However, if the authority finds that a person  is offering or developing
a project that is not within the scope of the certificate of need, the authority may limit the  project
as specified in the issued certificate of need or reconsider the application. A certificate  of need is
not transferable.
(7) Nothing in this section applies to any hospital, skilled nursing  or intermediate care service
or facility that seeks to replace equipment with equipment of similar  basic technological function
or an upgrade that improves  the quality or cost-effectiveness of the service provided. Any person
acquiring such replacement or upgrade shall file  a letter of intent for the project in accordance with
the rules of the authority if the price of the replacement equipment or upgrade exceeds $1 million.
(8) Except as  required in subsection (1) of this section for a new hospital or new skilled nursing
or intermediate care service or facility not operating as a Medicare swing bed program,  nothing in
this section requires a rural hospital  as defined in ORS 442.470 [ (5)(a)(A) and (B) ] (6)(a)(A) and (B)
to obtain a certificate of need.
(9) Nothing in this section applies to basic  health services, but basic health services do not in-
clude:
(a) Magnetic resonance imaging scanners;
(b) Positron emission tomography scanners;
(c) Cardiac catheterization equipment;
(d) Megavoltage radiation therapy equipment;
(e) Extracorporeal shock wave lithotriptors;
(f) Neonatal intensive care;
(g) Burn care;
(h) Trauma care;
(i) Inpatient psychiatric services;
(j) Inpatient chemical dependency services;
(k) Inpatient rehabilitation services;
(L) Open heart surgery; or
(m) Organ transplant services.
(10) In addition to any other remedy  provided by law, whenever it appears that any person is
engaged in, or  is about to engage in, any acts that constitute a violation of this section, or any rule
or order issued by the authority under this section, the authority may institute proceedings in the
circuit courts to enforce obedience to such statute, rule or  order by injunction or by other proc-
esses, mandatory or otherwise.
(11) As used in this section, “basic  health services” means health services offered in or through
a hospital licensed  under ORS chapter 441, except skilled nursing or intermediate care nursing fa-
cilities or services and those services specified in subsection (9) of this section.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 442.315, as amended by section 23, chapter  608, Oregon Laws 2013, is
amended to read:
442.315. (1) Any new hospital or new  skilled nursing or intermediate care service or facility not
excluded  pursuant  to ORS 441.065 shall obtain a certificate of need from the Oregon Health Au-
thority prior to an offering or development.
Enrolled House Bill 3261 (HB 3261-B) Page 7
(2) The authority shall adopt rules specifying criteria and procedures for  making decisions as
to the need for the new services or facilities.
(3)(a) An applicant for a certificate of need  shall apply to the authority on forms provided for
this purpose by authority rule.
(b) An applicant shall pay a  fee prescribed as provided in this section. Subject to the approval
of the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, the authority shall prescribe application fees,
based on the complexity and scope of the proposed project.
(4) The authority shall be the  decision-making authority for the purpose of certificates of need.
The authority may establish an expedited review  process for an application for a certificate of need
to rebuild a long term care facility, relocate  buildings that are part of a long term care facility or
relocate long term care facility bed capacity from one long term care facility to  another. The au-
thority shall issue a proposed  order not later than 120 days after the date a complete application
for expedited review is received by the authority.
(5)(a) An applicant or any affected person who is  dissatisfied with the proposed decision of the
authority is entitled to an informal hearing in the course of review and before a final decision is
rendered.
(b) Following a final decision being rendered  by the authority, an applicant or any affected
person may request a reconsideration hearing pursuant to ORS chapter 183.
(c) In any proceeding brought by an affected person or an  applicant challenging an authority
decision under this subsection, the authority shall  follow procedures consistent with the provisions
of ORS chapter 183 relating to a contested case.
(6) Once a certificate of need has been issued,  it may not be revoked or rescinded unless it was
acquired by fraud or deceit. However, if the authority finds that a person  is offering or developing
a project that is not within the scope of the certificate of need, the authority may limit the  project
as specified in the issued certificate of need or reconsider the application. A certificate  of need is
not transferable.
(7) Nothing in this section applies to any hospital, skilled nursing  or intermediate care service
or facility that seeks to replace equipment with equipment of similar  basic technological function
or an upgrade that improves  the quality or cost-effectiveness of the service provided. Any person
acquiring such replacement or upgrade shall file  a letter of intent for the project in accordance with
the rules of the authority if the price of the replacement equipment or upgrade exceeds $1 million.
(8) Except as  required in subsection (1) of this section for a new hospital or new skilled nursing
or intermediate care service or facility not operating as a Medicare swing bed program,  nothing in
this section requires a rural hospital  as defined in ORS 442.470 [ (5)(a)(A) and (B) ] (6)(a)(A) and (B)
to obtain a certificate of need.
(9) Nothing in this section applies to basic  health services, but basic health services do not in-
clude:
(a) Magnetic resonance imaging scanners;
(b) Positron emission tomography scanners;
(c) Cardiac catheterization equipment;
(d) Megavoltage radiation therapy equipment;
(e) Extracorporeal shock wave lithotriptors;
(f) Neonatal intensive care;
(g) Burn care;
(h) Trauma care;
(i) Inpatient psychiatric services;
(j) Inpatient chemical dependency services;
(k) Inpatient rehabilitation services;
(L) Open heart surgery; or
(m) Organ transplant services.
(10) In addition to any other remedy  provided by law, whenever it appears that any person is
engaged in, or  is about to engage in, any acts that constitute a violation of this section, or any rule
Enrolled House Bill 3261 (HB 3261-B) Page 8
or order issued by the authority under this section, the authority may institute proceedings in the
circuit courts to enforce obedience to such statute, rule or  order by injunction or by other proc-
esses, mandatory or otherwise.
(11) As used in this section, “basic  health services” means health services offered in or through
a hospital licensed  under ORS chapter 441, except skilled nursing or intermediate care nursing fa-
cilities or services and those services specified in subsection (9) of this section.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 442.394 is amended to read:
442.394. (1) A hospital or ambulatory surgical center shall bill and accept  as payment in full an
amount determined in accordance with the payment methodology prescribed by the Oregon  Health
Authority under ORS 442.392.
(2) This section  does not apply to type A or type B hospitals , as described in ORS 442.470 , or
rural critical access hospitals , as defined in ORS [ 315.613] 442.470.
SECTION 12.  ORS 442.563 is amended to read:
442.563. (1) The Office of Rural Health shall establish criteria  for certifying individuals eligible
for the tax credit authorized by ORS 315.613[ , 315.616 or 315.619 ]. Upon application therefor,  the
office shall certify individuals eligible for the tax credit authorized by ORS 315.613.
(2) The classification of rural hospitals  for purposes of determining eligibility under this section
shall be the classification of the hospital in effect on January 1, 1991.
SECTION 13.  ORS 676.450 is amended to read:
676.450. The Health Care Provider Incentive Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General Fund. Interest  earned by the Health Care Provider Incentive Fund
shall be credited to the fund. The fund consists of moneys appropriated to the  fund by the
Legislative Assembly and gifts, grants  or other moneys contributed to the fund by any
source, whether public or private.  Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the
Oregon Health Authority to carry out ORS 676.460 and section 3 of this 2017 Act .
SECTION 14.  Section 13, chapter 829, Oregon Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 13.  (1) Service agreements under  ORS 442.574 [ and 348.303] that are in effect on [ the op-
erative date of this section ] January 1, 2018,  shall remain in  effect for the term specified in the
agreement.
(2) Individuals participating in the primary care provider loan repayment program  on [ the oper-
ative date of this section ] January 1,  2018, shall continue to participate for the duration of the term
of the individual’s commitment made pursuant to ORS 413.233.
(3) Nothing in the repeal  of ORS [ 348.303,] 413.233 and 442.574 relieves a person of a liability,
duty or obligation accruing under or with respect to ORS [ 348.303,] 413.233 and  442.574. Payments
made by participants to discharge an obligation arising under ORS [ 348.303 (6) or (7), ] 413.233 (2)(e)
or 442.574 shall be deposited to the Health Care Provider Incentive  Fund established [ in section 1
of this 2015 Act ] under ORS 676.450.
(4) The duties, rights and obligations of the Office of Rural Health  under ORS 442.574 are
transferred to the Oregon Health Authority.
(5) Any unexpended balances of moneys in the Primary Health Care Loan  Forgiveness Program
Fund are transferred to the Health Care Provider Incentive Fund established under [ section 1  of this
2015 Act ] ORS 676.450 and shall be used by the Oregon Health Authority to carry out [ section 2 of
this 2015 Act ] ORS 676.460 and to administer the service agreements entered into pursuant to  ORS
442.574 that remain in effect under subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 15.  Section 9, chapter 829, Oregon Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 9.  ORS [ 348.303,] 413.127, 413.233, 442.573, 442.574, 676.550, 676.552, 676.554 and 676.556 are
repealed.
SECTION 16.  Section 12, chapter 829, Oregon Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 12. The repeal of ORS [ 348.303,] 413.127, 413.233, 442.573, 442.574, 676.550, 676.552, 676.554
and 676.556 by section 9 , [ of this 2015 Act ] chapter 829, Oregon Laws 2015,  becomes operative
January 2, 2018.
SECTION 17.  Section 2 of this 2017 Act is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 3261 (HB 3261-B) Page 9
Sec. 2.  (1) As used in this section, “financial incentive programs” includes but is  not limited to
the:
(a) Rural health care provider tax credit available under ORS 315.613;
[(b) Rural medical practitioners insurance subsidy program under ORS 676.550; ]
[(c)] (b) Scholars for a Healthy Oregon Initiative created by ORS 348.303; and
[(d) Primary Health Care Loan Forgiveness Program created by ORS 442.574; and ]
[(e)] (c)  Incentives provided by the health care provider incentive program created by ORS
676.460.
(2) In order to evaluate the effectiveness of  state financial incentive programs in recruiting
health care providers to practice  in rural and medically underserved areas and retaining health care
providers  in  rural and medically underserved areas, the Oregon Health Policy Board shall collect
information about financial incentive program participants, which may include:
(a) The month and year of entry into the program;
(b) The locations of service and duration of service in each location;
(c) The main services provided, discipline, specialty and hours of direct patient care;
(d) The percentage of services provided through telemedicine; and
(e) Other demographic information that the board and the Office of Rural Health determine  to
be useful in the evaluation.
(3) To collect the data described in subsection (2) of this section, the  board shall use unique
provider identifiers and link the identifiers to the provider data reported under ORS 442.466.
(4) The board shall compile and analyze the  data collected under this section and report its
findings and analysis to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to health  every
two years.
SECTION 18.
(1) The report described in section 1 (2) of this 2017  Act is first due no later
than February 1, 2018, and each odd-numbered year thereafter.
(2) The report described in section 2 (4) of this 2017 Act is first  due no later than Sep-
tember 15, 2018.
SECTION 19. The amendments to section 2 of this 2017 Act by section 17 of this 2017 Act
become operative on January 2, 2018.
SECTION 20. This 2017 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2017
regular session of the Seventy-ninth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 3261 (HB 3261-B) Page 10
Passed by House July 5, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate July 7, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3261 (HB 3261-B) Page 11